Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB475.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 151B.190 is amended to read as follows:
Vocational rehabilitation services shall be provided directly or through public or private
instrumentalities to any individual with a physical or mental disability:
(1) Who maintains a domicile in the Commonwealth at the time of filing his or her
application therefor, and whose vocational rehabilitation the State Vocational
Rehabilitation Agency determines after full investigation can be satisfactorily
achieved; or
(2) Who is eligible therefor under the terms of an agreement with another state or with
the federal government.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/11/2025 10:10 AM Jacketed